fi: Kasetin aitous: Yhteensopiva; OEM; Alkuperäinen; Täytetty uudelleen; Uudelleenvalmistettu; Kolmannen osapuolen; Muu
en: Cartridge authenticity: Compatible; OEM; Original; Refilled; Remanufactured; Third-party; Other
ko: 카트리지 정품 여부: 호환; OEM; 오리지널; 리필; 재제조; 타사; 기타
da: Patron-ægthed: Kompatibel; OEM; Original; Genopfyldt; Genfremstillet; Tredjepart; Andet
zh-TW: 墨匣真偽性: 相容; OEM; 原生; 填充式; 再製造; 第三方; 其他
cs: Autenticita kazety: Kompatibilní; OEM; Originál; Doplněný; Repasovaný; Třetí strana; Jiné
it: Autenticità della cartuccia: Compatibile; OEM; Originale; Ricaricato; Rigenerato; Di terze parti; Altro
fr: Authenticité de la cartouche: Compatible; OEM; Original; Rechargé; Reconditionné; Tiers; Autre
sk-SK: Pravosť kazety: Kompatibilný; OEM; Originál; Dopĺňaný; Repasovaný; Tretia strana; Iné
nl: Cartridge authenticiteit: Compatibel; OEM; Origineel; Bijgevuld; Gereviseerd; Externe partij; Andere
ru: Подлинность картриджа: Совместимый; OEM; Оригинал; Перезаправленный; Восстановленный; Стороннего производителя; Другой
hr-HR: Autentičnost kasete: Kompatibilan; OEM; Izvornik; Napunjen; Proizveden ponovno; Treća strana; Ostalo
zh-CN: 墨盒真伪: 兼容; OEM; 原创; 再填充; 再制造; 第三方; 其他
pt-PT: Autenticidade do consumível: Compatível; OEM; Original; Recarregado; Remanufaturado; Terceiros; Outro
es: Autenticidad del cartucho: Compatible; OEM; Original; Recargado; Remanufacturado; Tercero; Otros
tr: Kartuş özgünlüğü: Uyumlu; OEM; Orijinal; Yeniden doldurulmuş; Yeniden üretilmiş; Üçüncü şahıs; Diğer
vi: Tính xác thực của hộp mực: Tương thích; Nhà sản xuất gốc; Nguyên bản; Đã nạp lại; Tái sản xuất; Bên thứ ba; Khác
lt-LT: Kasetės autentiškumas: Suderinamas; Originalių dalių gamintojas; Originalus; Perpildytas; Atnaujintas; Trečioji šalis; Kita
th: ความแท้ของตลับหมึก: ใช้ร่วมได้; OEM; ต้นฉบับ; เติมใหม่; ผลิตใหม่; บุคคลภายนอก; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Autenticidade do cartucho: Compatível; OEM; Original; Recarregado; Remanufaturado; Terceiro; Outro
ro-RO: Autenticitate cartuș: Compatibil; OEM; Original; Reîncărcat; Recondițonitat; Terț; Altele
de: Kartuschen-Authentizität: Kompatibel; OEM; Original; Nachgefüllt; Wiederaufbereitet; Drittpartei; Sonstiges
nb: Kassettautentisitet: Kompatibel; OEM; Original; Påfylt; Reprodusert; Tredjepart; Annet
el: Γνησιότητα κασέτας: Συμβατό; OEM; Αυθεντικό; Αναγομωμένο; Ανακατασκευασμένο; Τρίτων κατασκευαστών; Άλλο
bg-BG: Автентичност на касетата: Съвместима; OEM; Оригинален; Презаредена; Рециклирана; Трета страна; Други
sl-SI: Pristnost kartuše: Združljiv; OEM; Izvoren; Ponovno polnjen; Obnovljen; Tretja oseba; Drugo
ja: カートリッジの純正性: 互換性; OEM; オリジナル; 詰め替え; リマニュファクチャード; 外部; その他
sv: Patronäkthet: Kompatibel; OEM; Original; Påfylld; Renoverad; Tredjepart; Övrigt
pl: Autentyczność wkładu: Kompatybilny; OEM; Oryginalny; Napełniony ponownie; Regenerowany; Strona trzecia; Inne
hu: Patronhitelesség: Kompatibilis; OEM; Eredeti; Újratöltött; Újragyártott; Harmadik fél; Egyéb